District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Subcontracting Requirements Exemption for Contracts for Health
Benefits to District Employees Temporary Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 2346(d) of the Small and Certified Business Enterprise Development and
Assistance Act of 2005, effective October 20, 2005 (D.C. Law 16-33; D.C. Official Code § 2-
218.46(d)), is amended by adding a new paragraph (4) to read as follows:
“(4) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (3) of this subsection, the subcontracting
plan for contracts to provide health benefits to District government employees and their families
shall be provided prior to commencement of performance of the plan year, and a bid or proposal
that does not include a subcontracting plan may be deemed responsive if it is submitted in
response to a solicitation to provide health benefits to District government employees and their
families.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective Date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of having taken effect.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2